Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

[§551G-41] Uniformity of application and
construction. In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration
must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its
subject matter among states that enact it. [L 2012, c 236, pt of §1]

Note

Section applies to proceedings begun before September 1,
2014, regardless of whether a guardianship or protective order has been
issued. L 2012, c 236, §2.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next